Utah statutes.
17D-1-603.   Notice and plat to lieutenant governor -- Recording
requirements -- Effective date.
(1)  If a county or municipal legislative body adopts a resolution approving
the withdrawal of an area from a special service district or the dissolution
of a special service district, the county or municipal legislative body, as
the case may be, shall:
(a)  within 30 days after adopting the resolution, file with the lieutenant
governor:
(i)  a copy of a notice of an impending boundary action, as defined in Section
67-1a-6.5, that meets the requirements of Subsection 67-1a-6.5(3); and
(ii)  in the case of a withdrawal, a copy of an approved final local entity
plat, as defined in Section 67-1a-6.5; and
(b)  upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of a certificate of withdrawal or
dissolution, as the case may be, under Section 67-1a-6.5, submit to the
recorder of the county in which the special service district is located:
(i)  the original notice of an impending boundary action;
(ii)  the original certificate of withdrawal or dissolution, as the case may
be;
(iii)  in the case of a withdrawal, the original approved final local entity
plat; and
(iv)  a certified copy of the resolution approving the withdrawal or
dissolution.
(2) (a)  Upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of the certificate of
withdrawal under Section 67-1a-6.5, the area to be withdrawn that is the
subject of the legislative body's resolution is withdrawn from the special
service district.
(b)  Upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of the certificate of dissolution
under Section 67-1a-6.5, the special service district is dissolved.
